Massachusetts, session 194th, H4465.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 18¾ of chapter 6A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out clauses (12) through (14), as amended by 
section 2 of chapter 135 of the acts of 2024, and inserting in place thereof the following 3 
clauses:- 
(12)(i)  to establish data collection and reporting standards for the trial court and for 
criminal justice agencies, including the probation service, the parole board, the executive office 
of public safety and security, the department of correction, houses of correction, county jails, and 
the several district attorneys to enable their submission of data including the capture and 
reporting of information on the criminal justice population, and the recording of all applicable 
charges and convictions. The secretary shall promulgate regulations regarding: (i) the format for 
the submission of the data and (ii) the categories and types of data required to be submitted, 
including, but not limited to: (A) a unique statewide identification number assigned to each 
person who enters the criminal justice system, including but not limited to the fingerprint-based 
state identification number and the probation central file number; (B) the offense for which the 

of 4 15 person has been incarcerated; (C) the date and time of the offense, (D) the location of the 
offense; (E) the race, ethnicity, gender and age of the person, whether the person is a primary 
caretaker of a child and the status of the person’s reproductive health needs; (F) the person’s risk 
and needs assessment scores; (G) their participation and completion of evidence-based programs; 
and (H) the dates of jail entrance or exist or the entrance date to the department or house of 
correction custody, wrap-up release date and actual release date. 
(ii)   the data collected pursuant to clause (i) shall be in the form of a cross-tracking 
system for data collection and reporting standards for the trial court and for criminal justice 
agencies, including the probation service, the parole board, the executive office of public safety 
and security, the department of correction, houses of correction, county jails, and the several 
district attorneys.  The cross-tracking system shall require the trial court and these agencies to 
use a unique state identification number assigned to each person who enters the criminal justice 
system and to incorporate the unique state identification number into their data systems upon a 
person’s initial transfer to their jurisdiction.  Anonymized cross-agency data shall be made 
available to the public for analysis through an application programming interface which allows 
access to all electronically available records. 
(13)  to establish data collection and reporting standards for the trial court and criminal 
justice agencies, including the probation service, the parole board, the executive office of public 
safety and security, the department of correction, houses of correction, county jails, and the 
several district attorneys relative to recidivism rates for rearraignment, reconviction and 
reincarceration.  Recidivism rates, determined by the data collected, shall be reported annually to 
the secretary.   The data shall be submitted by each agency to the secretary who shall 
subsequently publish the information quarterly on the executive office of public safety and 

of 4 38 security website.  Reported data shall be tracked over 1-, 2- and 3-year periods and include 
categorizations by race, ethnicity, gender and age. 
(14)  to establish data collection and reporting standards for the trial court and criminal 
justice agencies, including the probation service, the parole board, the executive office of public 
safety and security, the department of correction, houses of correction, county jails, and the 
several district attorneys to standardize methods of reporting of race and ethnicity data to 
facilitate assessment of the racial and ethnic composition of the criminal justice population of the 
commonwealth. The trial court and these agencies shall coordinate to ensure that racial and 
ethnic data related to populations, trends and outcomes is reported accurately to the secretary of 
the executive office of public safety and security and the public. 
SECTION 2. Section 11 of chapter 7D of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby 
amended by striking out the second paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following 
paragraph:- 
The board shall meet quarterly to review the compliance of the trial court and criminal 
justice agencies, including the probation service, the parole board, the executive office of public 
safety and security, the department of correction, houses of correction and, county jails and the 
several district attorneys in: (1) collecting and submitting data required by paragraphs 12, 13 and 
14 of section 18¾ of chapter 6A; (2) making said data available to the public as required by said 
paragraphs 12, 13 and 14 of said section 18¾ through the development of data portals to make 
data without personally identifiable information so available; and (3) maintaining policies 
ensuring accurate data collection across racial, ethnic and gender classifications; provided, that 
compliance shall include a review of whether the methods of data collection are appropriately 

of 4 60 screening for gender-specific risk or needs that may be addressed by evidence-based programs. 
A report on the collection of data and the compliance with justice reinvestment policies shall be 
submitted annually to the clerks of the house of representatives and the senate on or before July 
1.